Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256.0111] DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES; CENTRAL OFFICE; LIMIT ON APPROPRIATIONS. new text end new text begin (a) This section is effective only for those fiscal years during which both the CPI-U inflation limits and the percentage increase limits under sections 256B.4914, subdivision 5b; 256R.23, subdivisions 7 and 8; and 256R.24, subdivision 3, are in effect. new text end new text begin (b) Any increase to Department of Human Services central office appropriations from one fiscal year to the next fiscal year shall not exceed four percent. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end